Utah statutes.
31A-22-1002.   Duration of coverage.

(1)  Any insurer assuming a workers' compensation risk shall carry it until the policy is canceled, either:

(a)  by agreement between the Division of Industrial Accidents in the Labor Commission, the insurer, and the employer; or

(b)  after:

(i) notice by the insurer to the employer as provided in Section 31A-21-303; and

(ii)  notice to the Division of Industrial Accidents in the Labor Commission as provided in Section 34A-2-205.

(2) Subsection (1) does not affect the requirements of Section 31A-22-1001.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

